Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-372
Cost of patient care; county board; duties.

It shall be the duty of the county board in each county to make such investigation as the department may require with regard to the ability to pay of any patient or relative of a patient who resides within the county. In making such investigation, the county board shall act in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department and shall promptly submit the required information to the department.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 10, p. 3053;

Laws 1989, LB 32, § 2.